Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 3 Personnel

31-11-49.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Center” means the Georgia Crime Information Center.

“Certify” and “certification” are synonymous with “license” and “licensure.”

“Emergency medical services personnel” means all individuals licensed by the department under this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-11-49

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 539, § 1/SB 76.

31-11-50.
Medical adviser.

To enhance the provision of emergency medical care, each ambulance service shall be required to have a medical adviser. The adviser shall be a physician licensed to practice medicine in this state and subject to approval by the medical consultant of the Emergency Health Section of the Department of Public Health. Ambulance services unable to obtain a medical adviser, due to unavailability or refusal of physicians to act as medical advisers, may request the district health director or his or her designee to act as medical adviser until the services of a physician are available.

The duties of the medical adviser shall be to provide medical direction and training for the ambulance service personnel in conformance with acceptable emergency medical practices and procedures.

This Code section shall not apply to any county having a population under 12,000 according to the United States decennial census of 1970 or any such future census.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3118, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1170, § 1A; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-36/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-1/HB 214.

Cross references.

Licensing of physicians, §

43-34-20

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-11-51.
Licensing of emergency medical services personnel; rules and regulations; use of conviction data in licensing decisions; retention of fingerprints.

As used in this Code section, the term “conviction data” means a record of a finding or verdict of guilty or plea of guilty or plea of nolo contendere with regard to any crime, regardless of whether an appeal of the conviction has been sought.

Except as otherwise provided for in this chapter, the board shall, by regulation, authorize the department to establish procedures and standards for the licensing of emergency medical services personnel. The department shall succeed to all rules and regulations, policies, procedures, and administrative orders of the composite board which were in effect on December 31, 2001, and which relate to the functions transferred to the department by this chapter. Such rules, regulations, policies, procedures, and administrative orders shall remain in effect until amended, repealed, superseded, or nullified by proper authority or as otherwise provided by law.

In reviewing applicants for initial licensure of emergency medical services personnel, the department shall be authorized pursuant to this Code section to obtain conviction data with respect to such applicants for the purposes of determining the suitability of the applicant for licensure.

The department shall by rule or regulation, consistent with the requirements of this subsection, establish a procedure for requesting a fingerprint based criminal history records check from the center and the Federal Bureau of Investigation. Fingerprints shall be in such form and of such quality as prescribed by the center and under standards adopted by the Federal Bureau of Investigation. Fees may be charged as necessary to cover the cost of the records search. An applicant may request that a criminal history records check be conducted by a state or local law enforcement agency or by a private vendor approved by the department. Fees for criminal history records checks shall be paid by the applicant to the entity processing the request at the time such request is made. The state or local law enforcement agency or private vendor shall remit payment to the center in such amount as required by the center for conducting a criminal history records check. The department shall accept a criminal history records check whether such request is made through a state or local law enforcement agency or through a private vendor approved by the department. Upon receipt of an authorized request, the center shall promptly cause such criminal records search to be conducted. The center shall notify the department in writing of any finding of disqualifying information, including, but not limited to, any conviction data regarding the fingerprint records check, or if there is no such finding.

An applicant with conviction data which indicates a conviction of a felony more than five but less than ten years prior to application shall not be disqualified for licensure, provided that such applicant has:

Successfully completed a training program approved by the department and sponsored by the Department of Corrections pursuant to Code Section 42-5-57; and

Met all other requirements as set forth in this chapter.

Conviction data received by the department or a state or local law enforcement agency shall be privileged and shall not be a public record or disclosed to any person. Conviction data shall be maintained by the department and the state or local law enforcement pursuant to laws regarding such records and the rules and regulations of the center and the Federal Bureau of Investigation. Penalties for the unauthorized release or disclosure of conviction data shall be as prescribed by law or rule or regulation of the center or Federal Bureau of Investigation.

The center, the department, or any law enforcement agency, or the employees of any such entities, shall neither be responsible for the accuracy of information provided pursuant to this Code section nor be liable for defamation, invasion of privacy, negligence, or any other claim relating to or arising from the dissemination of information pursuant to this Code section.

If the department is participating in the program described in subparagraph (a)(1)(F) of Code Section 35-3-33, the Georgia Bureau of Investigation and the Federal Bureau of Investigation shall be authorized to retain fingerprints obtained pursuant to this Code section for such program, and the department shall notify the individual whose fingerprints were taken of the parameters of such retention.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3112.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 281, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1145, § 2; Ga. L. 2011, p. 539, § 2/SB 76; Ga. L. 2012, p. 83, § 4/HB 247; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 31/HB 79; Ga. L. 2021, p. 782, § 3/SB 46; Ga. L. 2022, p. 399, § 1/SB 404.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, substituted “Except as otherwise provided for in this chapter, the board” for “The board” at the beginning of subsection (b); added subsection (e); and redesignated former subsections (e) and (f) as present subsections (f) and (g), respectively.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added subsection (h).

31-11-52.
Certification and recertification of, and training for, paramedics and cardiac technicians; qualifications by felons.

The department shall establish procedures and standards for certifying and recertifying paramedics and cardiac technicians. An applicant for initial certification as a paramedic or a cardiac technician must:

Submit a completed application on a form to be prescribed by the department, which shall include evidence that the applicant is 18 years of age or older and is of good moral character;

Submit from the department a notarized statement that the applicant has completed a training course approved by the department;

Submit to the department a fee as set forth in the regulations of the department; and

Meet such other requirements as are set forth in the rules and regulations of the department.

The department shall also adopt procedures and standards for its approval of paramedic training courses and cardiac technician training courses. The department shall adopt such regulations after consultation with appropriate public and private agencies and organizations concerned with medical education and the practice of medicine. Procedures and standards adopted by the department shall be consistent with the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

An applicant convicted of a felony more than five but less than ten years prior to application shall not be disqualified for certification, provided that such applicant has:

Successfully completed a training program approved by the department and sponsored by the Department of Corrections pursuant to Code Section 42-5-57; and

Met all other requirements as set forth in this chapter.

History.

Code 1933, §§ 88-3112.1, 88-3112.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 281, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1923, § 3; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1145, § 3; Ga. L. 2021, p. 782, § 4/SB 46.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, added subsection (c).

31-11-53.
Services which may be rendered by certified emergency medical technicians and trainees.

Upon certification by the department, emergency medical technicians may do any of the following:

Render first-aid and resuscitation services as taught in the United States Department of Transportation basic training courses for emergency medical technicians or an equivalent course approved by the department;

Upon the order of a duly licensed physician, administer approved intravenous solutions and opioid antagonists; and

Upon the order of a duly licensed physician during a public health emergency, as defined in Code Section 31-12-1.1, administer vaccines.

While in training preparatory to becoming certified, emergency medical technician trainees may perform any of the functions specified in this Code section under the direct supervision of a duly licensed physician or a registered nurse.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3112.3, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 281, § 4; Ga. L. 2014, p. 683, § 2-3/HB 965; Ga. L. 2021, p. 782, § 5/SB 46.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (a)(1), substituted “; and” for a period at the end of paragraph (a)(2), and added paragraph (a)(3).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 683, § 2-1/HB 965, not codified by the General Assembly, provides:

“WHEREAS, Naloxone is an opioid antagonist developed to counter the effects of opiate overdose, specifically the life threatening depression of the central nervous and respiratory systems; and

“WHEREAS, Naloxone is clinically administered via intramuscular, intravenous, or subcutaneous injection; and

“WHEREAS, Naloxone is administered outside of a clinical setting or facility intranasally via nasal atomizer; and

“WHEREAS, the American Medical Association supported the lay administration of this life saving drug in 2012; and

“WHEREAS, similar Naloxone access laws have reversed more than 10,000 opioid overdoses by lay people in other states; and

“WHEREAS, the American Medical Association acknowledged that ‘fatalities caused by opioid overdose can devastate families and communities, and we must do more to prevent these unnecessary deaths’; and

“WHEREAS, the National Institutes of Health found that Naloxone ‘lacks any psychoactive or addictive qualities . . . without any potential for abuse . . . [and] medical side effects or other problematic unintended consequences associated with Naloxone have not been reported’; and

“WHEREAS, any administration of Naloxone to an individual experiencing an opioid overdose must be followed by professional medical attention and treatment.”

Ga. L. 2014, p. 683, § 3-1/HB 965, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that Parts I and II of this Act shall apply to all acts committed on or after April 24, 2014.

For application of this statute in
2021, see Executive Order 01.07.21.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in
2021 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

31-11-53.1.
Automated external defibrillator program; establishment; regulations; liability.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Automated external defibrillator” means a defibrillator which:

Is capable of cardiac rhythm analysis;

Will charge and be capable of being activated to deliver a countershock after electrically detecting the presence of certain cardiac dysrhythmias; and

Is capable of continuous recording of the cardiac dysrhythmia at the scene with a mechanism for transfer and storage or for printing for review subsequent to use.

“Defibrillation” means to terminate ventricular fibrillation.

“First responder” means any person or agency who provides on-site care until the arrival of a duly licensed ambulance service. This shall include, but not be limited to, persons who routinely respond to calls for assistance through an affiliation with law enforcement agencies, fire suppression agencies, rescue agencies, and others.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that an automated external defibrillator may be used by any person for the purpose of saving the life of another person in cardiac arrest. In order to ensure public health and safety:

It is recommended that all persons who have access to or use an automated external defibrillator obtain appropriate training as set forth in the rules and regulations of the Department of Public Health. It is further recommended that such training include at a minimum the successful completion of:

A nationally recognized health care provider/professional rescuer level cardiopulmonary resuscitation course; and

A department established or approved course which includes demonstrated proficiency in the use of an automated external defibrillator;

All persons and agencies possessing and maintaining an automated external defibrillator shall notify the appropriate emergency medical services system of the existence and location of the automated external defibrillator prior to said defibrillator being placed in use;

All persons who use an automated external defibrillator shall activate the emergency medical services system as soon as reasonably possible by calling 9-1-1 or the appropriate emergency telephone number upon use of the automated external defibrillator; and

Within a reasonable period of time, all persons who use an automated external defibrillator shall make available a printed or electronically stored report to the licensed emergency medical services provider which transports the patient.

All persons who provide instruction to others in the use of the automated external defibrillator shall have completed an instructor course established or approved by the department.

The department shall establish an automated external defibrillator program for use by emergency medical technicians. Such program shall be subject to the direct supervision of a medical adviser approved under Code Section 31-11-50. No emergency medical technician shall be authorized to use an automated external defibrillator to defibrillate a person unless that defibrillator is a properly maintained automated external defibrillator and that emergency medical technician:

Submits to and has approved by the department an application for such use, and in considering that application the department may obtain and use the recommendation of the local coordinating entity for the health district in which the applicant will use such defibrillator;

Successfully completes an automated external defibrillator training program established or approved by the department;

Is subject to protocols requiring that both the emergency physician who receives a patient defibrillated by that emergency medical technician and the medical adviser for the defibrillator program review the department required prehospital care report and any other documentation of the defibrillation of any person by that emergency medical technician and send a written report of such review to the district EMS medical director of the health district in which the defibrillation occurred; and

Obtains a passing score on an annual automated external defibrillator proficiency exam given in connection with that program.

It shall not be necessary for a licensed emergency medical service, licensed neonatal transport service, or other services licensed by the department which provide care administered by cardiac technicians or paramedics to obtain department approval for the use of an automated external defibrillator on licensed vehicles.

Any emergency medical technician who violates the provisions of this Code section shall be subject to having revoked by the department that person’s authority to use an automated external defibrillator. Such a violation shall also be grounds for any entity which issues a license or certificate authorizing such emergency medical technician to perform emergency medical services to take disciplinary action against such person, including but not limited to suspension or revocation of that license or certificate. Such a violation shall also be grounds for the employer of such emergency medical technician to impose any sanction available thereto, including but not limited to dismissal.

Any first responder who gratuitously and in good faith renders emergency care or treatment by the use of or provision of an automated external defibrillator, without objection of the injured victim or victims thereof, shall not be held liable for any civil damages as a result of such care or treatment or as a result of any act or failure to act in providing or arranging further medical treatment where the person acts without gross negligence or intent to harm or as an ordinary reasonably prudent person would have acted under the same or similar circumstances, even if such individual does so without benefit of the appropriate training. This provision includes paid persons who extend care or treatment without expectation of remuneration from the patient or victim for receiving the defibrillation care or treatment.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-11-53.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1918, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 661, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 660, § 4/HB 470; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-37/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Cross references.

Automated external defibrillator required in high schools, §

20-2-775

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2005, the subsection (b) designation preceding paragraph (b)(3) was deleted.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-11-53.2.
“Lay rescuer” defined; use of automated external defibrillators.

As used in this Code section, the term “lay rescuer” means a person trained to provide cardiopulmonary resuscitation and to use an automated external defibrillator, as defined in Code Section 31-11-53.1, and who is participating in a physician or medically authorized automated external defibrillator program.

The following guidelines shall be applicable to the use of automated external defibrillators by lay rescuers:

Any person or entity who acquires an automated external defibrillator shall ensure that:

Expected users of the automated external defibrillator receive American Heart Association or American Red Cross training in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and automated external defibrillator use or complete an equivalent nationally recognized course;

The defibrillator is maintained and tested according to the manufacturer’s operational guidelines;

There is involvement of a licensed physician or other person authorized by the composite board in the site’s automated external defibrillator program to ensure compliance with requirements for training, notification, and maintenance; and

Any person who renders emergency care or treatment to a person in cardiac arrest by using an automated external defibrillator activates the emergency medical services system as soon as possible and reports any clinical use of the automated external defibrillator to the licensed physician or other person authorized by the composite board who is supervising the program; and

Any person or entity who acquires an automated external defibrillator shall notify an agent of the emergency communications or vehicle dispatch center of the existence, location, and type of automated external defibrillator.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-11-53.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 776, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 31.

Cross references.

Immunity for operators of external defibrillators, §

51-1-29.3

.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 enactment of this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 146 (2001).

31-11-54.
Services which may be rendered by paramedics and paramedic trainees.

Upon certification by the department, paramedics may perform any service that a cardiac technician is permitted to perform. In addition, upon the order of a duly licensed physician and subject to the conditions set forth in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 31-11-55, paramedics may perform any other procedures which they have been both trained and certified to perform, including, but not limited to:

Administration of parenteral injections of diuretics, anticonvulsants, hypertonic glucose, antihistamines, broncho- dilators, emetics, narcotic antagonists, and others, and administration of opioid antagonists;

Cardioversion; and

Endotracheal suction.

While in training preparatory to becoming certified, paramedic trainees may perform any of the functions specified in this Code section under the direct supervision of a duly licensed physician, a registered nurse, or an approved paramedic clinical preceptor.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3112.5, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 281, § 6; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1923, § 4; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1782, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1145, § 4; Ga. L. 2014, p. 683, § 2-4/HB 965.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 683, § 2-1/HB 965, not codified by the General Assembly, provides:

“WHEREAS, Naloxone is an opioid antagonist developed to counter the effects of opiate overdose, specifically the life threatening depression of the central nervous and respiratory systems; and

“WHEREAS, Naloxone is clinically administered via intramuscular, intravenous, or subcutaneous injection; and

“WHEREAS, Naloxone is administered outside of a clinical setting or facility intranasally via nasal atomizer; and

“WHEREAS, the American Medical Association supported the lay administration of this life saving drug in 2012; and

“WHEREAS, similar Naloxone access laws have reversed more than 10,000 opioid overdoses by lay people in other states; and

“WHEREAS, the American Medical Association acknowledged that ‘fatalities caused by opioid overdose can devastate families and communities, and we must do more to prevent these unnecessary deaths’; and

“WHEREAS, the National Institutes of Health found that Naloxone ‘lacks any psychoactive or addictive qualities . . . without any potential for abuse . . . [and] medical side effects or other problematic unintended consequences associated with Naloxone have not been reported’; and

“WHEREAS, any administration of Naloxone to an individual experiencing an opioid overdose must be followed by professional medical attention and treatment.”

Ga. L. 2014, p. 683, § 3-1/HB 965, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that Parts I and II of this Act shall apply to all acts committed on or after April 24, 2014.

31-11-55.
Services which may be rendered by certified cardiac technicians and trainees.

Upon certification by the department, cardiac technicians may do any of the following:

Render first-aid and resuscitation services;

Upon the order of a duly licensed physician and as recommended by the Georgia Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council and approved by the department:

Perform cardiopulmonary resuscitation and defibrillation in a hemodynamically unstable patient;

Administer approved intravenous solutions;

Administer parenteral injections of antiarrhythmic agents, vagolytic agents, chronotropic agents, alkalizing agents, analgesic agents, and vasopressor agents or administer opioid antagonists;

Perform pulmonary ventilation by esophageal airway and endotracheal intubation; and

Upon the order of a duly licensed physician during a public health emergency, as defined in Code Section 31-12-1.1, administer vaccines.

While in training preparatory to becoming certified, cardiac technician trainees may perform any of the functions specified in this Code section under the direct supervision of a duly licensed physician or a registered nurse.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3112.4, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 281, § 5; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1145, § 5; Ga. L. 2014, p. 683, § 2-5/HB 965; Ga. L. 2021, p. 782, § 6/SB 46.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, deleted “and” at the end of subparagraph (a)(2)(C); substituted “; and” for a period at the end of subparagraph (a)(2)(D); and added subparagraph (a)(2)(E).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 683, § 2-1/HB 965, not codified by the General Assembly, provides:

“WHEREAS, Naloxone is an opioid antagonist developed to counter the effects of opiate overdose, specifically the life threatening depression of the central nervous and respiratory systems; and

“WHEREAS, Naloxone is clinically administered via intramuscular, intravenous, or subcutaneous injection; and

“WHEREAS, Naloxone is administered outside of a clinical setting or facility intranasally via nasal atomizer; and

“WHEREAS, the American Medical Association supported the lay administration of this life saving drug in 2012; and

“WHEREAS, similar Naloxone access laws have reversed more than 10,000 opioid overdoses by lay people in other states; and

“WHEREAS, the American Medical Association acknowledged that ‘fatalities caused by opioid overdose can devastate families and communities, and we must do more to prevent these unnecessary deaths’; and

“WHEREAS, the National Institutes of Health found that Naloxone ‘lacks any psychoactive or addictive qualities . . . without any potential for abuse . . . [and] medical side effects or other problematic unintended consequences associated with Naloxone have not been reported’; and

“WHEREAS, any administration of Naloxone to an individual experiencing an opioid overdose must be followed by professional medical attention and treatment.”

Ga. L. 2014, p. 683, § 3-1/HB 965, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that Parts I and II of this Act shall apply to all acts committed on or after April 24, 2014.

For application of this statute in
2021, see Executive Order 01.07.21.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 and 2021 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

31-11-55.1.
Opioid antagonists administered by first responder to save life of person experiencing opioid related overdose.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“First responder” means any person or agency who provides on-site care until the arrival of a duly licensed ambulance service. This shall include, but not be limited to, persons who routinely respond to calls for assistance through an affiliation with law enforcement agencies, fire departments, and rescue agencies.

“Opioid antagonist” means any drug that binds to opioid receptors and blocks or inhibits the effects of opioids acting on those receptors and that is approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of an opioid related overdose.

“Opioid related overdose” means an acute condition, including, but not limited to, extreme physical illness, decreased level of consciousness, respiratory depression, coma, mania, or death, resulting from the consumption or use of an opioid or another substance with which an opioid was combined or that a layperson would reasonably believe to be resulting from the consumption or use of an opioid or another substance with which an opioid was combined.

An opioid antagonist may be administered or provided by any first responder for the purpose of saving the life of a person experiencing an opioid related overdose. In order to ensure public health and safety:

All first responders who have access to or maintain an opioid antagonist obtain appropriate training as set forth in the rules and regulations of the Department of Public Health;

All law enforcement agencies, fire departments, rescue agencies, and other similar entities shall notify the appropriate emergency medical services system of the possession and maintenance of opioid antagonists by its personnel; and

Within a reasonable period of time, all first responders who administer or provide an opioid antagonist shall make available a printed or electronically stored report to the licensed ambulance service which transports the patient.

A pharmacy licensed in this state may issue opioid antagonists to first responders for use pursuant to this Code section in the same manner and subject to the same requirements as provided in Code Section 26-4-116.

Any first responder who gratuitously and in good faith renders emergency care or treatment by administering or providing an opioid antagonist shall not be held liable for any civil damages as a result of such care or treatment or as a result of any act or failure to act in providing or arranging further medical treatment where the person acts without gross negligence or intent to harm or as an ordinary reasonably prudent person would have acted under the same or similar circumstances, even if such individual does so without benefit of the appropriate training. This subsection includes paid persons who extend care or treatment without expectation of remuneration from the patient or victim for receiving the opioid antagonist.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-11-55.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 683, § 2-6/HB 965.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 683, § 2-1/HB 965, not codified by the General Assembly, provides:

“WHEREAS, Naloxone is an opioid antagonist developed to counter the effects of opiate overdose, specifically the life threatening depression of the central nervous and respiratory systems; and

“WHEREAS, Naloxone is clinically administered via intramuscular, intravenous, or subcutaneous injection; and

“WHEREAS, Naloxone is administered outside of a clinical setting or facility intranasally via nasal atomizer; and

“WHEREAS, the American Medical Association supported the lay administration of this life saving drug in 2012; and

“WHEREAS, similar Naloxone access laws have reversed more than 10,000 opioid overdoses by lay people in other states; and

“WHEREAS, the American Medical Association acknowledged that ‘fatalities caused by opioid overdose can devastate families and communities, and we must do more to prevent these unnecessary deaths’; and

“WHEREAS, the National Institutes of Health found that Naloxone ‘lacks any psychoactive or addictive qualities . . . without any potential for abuse . . . [and] medical side effects or other problematic unintended consequences associated with Naloxone have not been reported’; and

“WHEREAS, any administration of Naloxone to an individual experiencing an opioid overdose must be followed by professional medical attention and treatment.”

Ga. L. 2014, p. 683, § 3-1/HB 965, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that Parts I and II of this Act shall apply to all acts committed on or after April 24, 2014.

31-11-55.2.
Administration of hydrocortisone sodium succinate intramuscular by emergency medical services personnel; training; reporting; immunity.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Congenital adrenal hyperplasia” means the salt-wasting form of the classic type of congenital adrenal hyperplasia.

“Emergency medical services personnel” means any person who has been certified as an emergency medical technician, cardiac technician, or paramedic.

Paramedics shall be authorized to administer hydrocortisone sodium succinate intramuscularly for the purpose of providing emergency care to a patient who:

Has congenital adrenal hyperplasia; or any adrenal insufficiency;

Is believed to be in adrenal crisis; and

Has on his or her person or in his or her belongings hydrocortisone sodium succinate in packaging that clearly states the appropriate dosage and has an unbroken seal.

In order to ensure public health and safety:

All emergency medical services personnel shall obtain appropriate training on congenital adrenal hyperplasia, and all paramedics shall obtain appropriate training regarding administration of hydrocortisone sodium succinate as set forth in the rules and regulations of the Department of Public Health; and

Within a reasonable period of time, all paramedics who administer hydrocortisone sodium succinate shall make available a printed or electronically stored report to the licensed ambulance service which transports the patient.

The immunity provided in Code Section 31-11-8 shall apply to any paramedic who in good faith renders emergency care pursuant to this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-11-55.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2021, p. 212, § 2/HB 346; Ga. L. 2022, p. 352, § 31/HB 1428.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective July 1, 2021.

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “salt-wasting” for “salt wasting” in paragraph (a)(1).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 212, § 1/HB 346, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘Jarom’s Act.’”

31-11-56.
Revocation of certificates issued to emergency medical technicians.

Certificates issued to emergency medical technicians pursuant to this chapter may be revoked for good cause, as set forth in the rules and regulations, by the department after notice to the certificate holder of the charges and an opportunity for hearing. Such proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3112.6, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 281, § 7.

31-11-57.
Revocation of certificates issued to paramedics and cardiac technicians.

Certificates issued to paramedics and cardiac technicians pursuant to this chapter may be revoked for good cause by the department in accordance with established rules and regulations, after notice to the certificate holder of the charges and an opportunity for hearing. Such proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” The department shall have the authority to conduct investigations and subpoena any documents relating to the fitness of paramedics and cardiac technicians. Such documents may be used in any hearing conducted by the department.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3112.7, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 281, § 8; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1170, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1923, § 5; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1145, § 6.

31-11-58.
Recertification of emergency medical technicians; continuing education requirements.

The department shall be authorized to require emergency medical technicians seeking recertification under this chapter to complete department approved continuing education. The department shall be authorized to approve courses including but not limited to courses offered by the department, the number of hours required, and the category in which these hours should be earned.

The department shall be authorized to waive the continuing education requirement in cases of hardship, disability, illness, or under such other circumstances as the department deems appropriate.

The department shall be authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to implement and ensure compliance with the requirements of this Code section.

This Code section shall apply to each certification and recertification cycle which begins after the 1992-1993 renewal.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3112.8, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 281, § 9; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1315, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1923, § 6; Ga. L. 1991, p. 597, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1082, § 1.

31-11-58.1.
Recertification of paramedics and cardiac technicians; continuing education requirements.

The department shall be authorized to require paramedics and cardiac technicians seeking recertification under this chapter to complete department approved continuing education of not less than 40 hours biennially. The department shall be authorized to approve courses including but not limited to courses offered by the department, the number of hours required, and the category in which these hours should be earned.

The department shall be authorized to waive the continuing education requirement in cases of hardship, disability, illness, or under such other circumstances as the department deems appropriate.

The department shall be authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to implement and ensure compliance with the requirements of this Code section.

This Code section shall apply to each recertification cycle which begins after the renewal deadline in 2000.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-11-58.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1082, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1145, § 7.

31-11-59.
Services of emergency medical technicians, paramedics, and cardiac technicians in hospitals.

Emergency medical technicians, paramedics, and cardiac technicians may render any service which they are authorized to render under Code Sections 31-11-53, 31-11-54, and 31-11-55, respectively, in any hospital. Such services shall not be rendered in lieu of the services of a physician or a registered professional nurse and shall only be rendered in a hospital at the discretion of and after the prior approval by the hospital governing authority on the order of a physician or, if a physician or registered professional nurse is present, at the direction of a physician or registered professional nurse, provided that such hospital has a currently valid permit or conditional permit issued by the department pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 7 of this title. The provisions of this Code section are cumulative and are not intended to limit the rendering of services by emergency medical technicians, cardiac technicians, and paramedics in any area in which they are already authorized to render such services.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3112.11, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1017, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 694, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1923, § 7.